Utah statutes.
63H-4-111.   Sales tax exemption.

The authority and its operators are exempt from sales and use tax imposed under Title 59, Chapter 12, Sales and Use Tax Act, for their purchases and sales related to the operation and maintenance of a scenic and historic railroad in and around the Heber Valley.

